Oklahoma, session 2025, SB510.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 289, O.S.L.
2023 (70 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 18-114.15), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 18-114.15. A. Beginning with the 2023-2024 school
year, certified personnel, as defined in Section 26-103 of Title 70
of the Oklahoma Statutes this title, in the public schools of
Oklahoma this state shall receive in salary and/or fringe benefits
not less than the amounts specified in the following schedule:
MINIMUM SALARY SCHEDULE
National
Years of Bachelor’s Board Master’s Doctor’s
Experience Degree Certification Degree Degree
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB510 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

0 $39,601 $40,759 $40,991 $42,381
1 $40,035 $41,193 $41,425 $42,815
2 $40,469 $41,628 $41,859 $43,249
3 $40,904 $42,062 $42,294 $43,684
4 $41,338 $42,496 $42,728 $44,118
5 $42,810 $43,968 $44,200 $45,590
6 $43,273 $44,432 $44,663 $46,054
7 $43,737 $44,895 $45,127 $46,517
8 $44,200 $45,358 $45,590 $46,980
9 $44,663 $45,822 $46,054 $47,444
10 $46,684 $47,844 $48,568 $50,945
11 $47,177 $48,336 $49,061 $51,438
12 $47,670 $48,829 $49,554 $51,931
13 $48,162 $49,322 $50,047 $52,424
14 $48,655 $49,815 $50,539 $52,916
15 $50,167 $51,327 $52,052 $54,430
16 $50,660 $51,820 $52,545 $54,923
17 $51,153 $52,313 $53,038 $55,416
18 $51,646 $52,806 $53,531 $55,909
19 $52,139 $53,299 $54,024 $56,402
20 $52,652 $53,813 $54,538 $56,917
21 $53,145 $54,306 $55,031 $57,410
22 $53,639 $54,799 $55,524 $57,903
23 $54,132 $55,292 $56,018 $58,397
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB510 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

24 $54,625 $55,785 $56,511 $58,890
25 $56,049 $57,232 $57,971 $60,395
Master’s Degree +
Years of National Board
Experience Certification
0 $42,149
1 $42,583
2 $43,018
3 $43,452
4 $43,886
5 $45,358
6 $45,822
7 $46,285
8 $46,749
9 $47,212
10 $49,728
11 $50,221
12 $50,713
13 $51,206
14 $51,699
15 $53,212
16 $53,705
17 $54,198
18 $54,691
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB510 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

19 $55,184
20 $55,698
21 $56,192
22 $56,685
23 $57,178
24 $57,671
25 $59,153
B. 1. When determining the Minimum Salary Schedule minimum
salary schedule, “fringe benefits” shall mean all or part of
retirement benefits, excluding the contributions made pursuant to
subsection A of Section 17-108.1 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title and the flexible benefit allowance pursuant to
Section 26-105 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title from
the flexible benefit allowance funds disbursed by the State Board of
Education and the State Board of Career and Technology Education
pursuant to Section 26-104 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes this
title.
2. If a school district intends to provide retirement benefits
to a teacher such that the teacher’s salary would be less than the
amounts set forth in the minimum salary schedule specified in
subsection A of this section, the district shall be required to
provide written notification to the teacher prior to his or her
employment or, if already employed by the district, no later than
thirty (30) days prior to the date the district elects to provide
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB510 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

reti rement benefits such that the teacher’s salary would be less
than the minimum salary schedule.
C. Any of the degrees referred to in this section shall be from
a college recognized by the State Board of Education. The Board
shall accept teaching experience from out-of-state school districts
that are accredited by the State Board of Education state board of
education or appropriate state accrediting agency for the districts.
The Board shall accept teaching experience from out-of-country
schools that are accredited or otherwise endorsed by the appropriate
national or regional accrediting or endorsement authority. Out-of-
country certification documentation in a language other than English
shall be analyzed by an educational credential evaluation service in
accordance with industry standards and guidelines and approved by
the State Department of Education. The person seeking to have
credit granted for out-of-country teaching experience shall be
responsible for all costs of the analysis by a credential evaluation
service. The Board shall accept teaching experience from primary
and secondary schools that are operated by the United States
Department of Defense or are affiliated with the United States
Department of State.
D. 1. For the purpose of state salary increments and
retirement, no teacher shall be granted credit for more than five
(5) years of active duty in the military service or out-of-state or
out-of-country teaching experience as a certified teacher or its
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB510 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

equi valent. Nothing in this section shall prohibit boards of
education from crediting more years of experience on district salary
schedules than those allowed for state purposes.
2. For the purpose of state salary increments, no teacher shall
be granted credit for more than ten (10) years of active duty in the
military service. For the purpose of retirement, no teacher shall
be granted credit for more than five (5) years of active duty in the
military service.
E. The State Board of Education shall recognize, for purposes
of certification and salary increments, all the years of experience
of a:
1. Certified teacher who teaches in the educational program of
the Department of Corrections, beginning with fiscal year 1981;
2. Vocational rehabilitation counselor under the Department of
Human Services if the counselor was employed as a certified teacher
by the State Department of Education when the Division of Vocational
Rehabilitation was transferred from the State Board of Career and
Technology Education or the State Board of Education to the Oklahoma
Public Welfare Commission on July 1, 1968;
3. Vocational rehabilitation counselor which were completed
while employed by the Department of Human Services if such counselor
was certified as a teacher or was eligible for certification as a
teacher in Oklahoma this state;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB510 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

4. Certified teacher which were completed while employed by the
Child Study Center located at University Hospital, if the teacher
was certified as a teacher in Oklahoma this state; and
5. Certified school psychologist or psychometrist which were
completed while employed as a doctoral intern, psychological
assistant, or psychologist with any agency of the State of Oklahoma
this state if the experience primarily involved work with persons of
school- or preschool-age and if the person was, at the time the
experience was acquired, certified as, or eligible for certification
as, a school psychologist or psychometrist.
F. The provisions of this section shall not apply to teachers
who have entered into postretirement employment with a public school
in Oklahoma this state and are still receiving a monthly retirement
benefit.
G. If a person employed as certified personnel, as defined in
Section 26-103 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title, by a
school district during the 2022-2023 school year was receiving a
salary above the step level indicated by the State Minimum Salary
Schedule state minimum salary schedule for the 2022-2023 school
year, the person shall receive a salary increase amount equal to the
amount indicated in subsection A of this section for the step level
indicated for the person, provided they remain he or she remains
employed by the same district, unless the hours or the duties of the
certified personnel are reduced proportionately.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB510 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

H. If a school district does not receive Foundation or Salary
Incentive Aid pursuant to Section 18-200.1 of Title 70 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title, funds shall be allocated by the State
Board of Education to implement the salary increases indicated in
subsection A of this section.
I. Persons employed as classroom instructional employees of
technology center school districts supervised by the State Board of
Career and Technology Education shall receive a salary increase
amount equal to the amount indicated in subsection A of this section
for the step level indicated for the person persons, provided they
remain employed by the same technology center school district,
unless the hours or the duties of the classroom instructional
employees are reduced proportionately.
J. Persons employed as correctional teachers or vocational
instructors by the Department of Corrections pursuant to Section
510.6a of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes or persons employed as
teachers by the Office of Juvenile Affairs shall receive a salary
increase amount equal to the amount indicated in subsection A of
this section for the step level indicated for the person persons,
provided they remain employed by the same Department of Corrections
or Office of Juvenile Affairs facility, unless the hours or the
duties of the correctional teachers, vocational instructors, or
teachers are reduced proportionately.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB510 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

K. Persons employed as teachers by the State Department of
Rehabilitation Services shall receive a salary increase amount equal
to the amount indicated in subsection A of this section for the step
level indicated for the person persons, provided they remain
employed by the State Department of Rehabilitation Services, unless
the hours or the duties of the teachers are reduced proportionately.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION
February 19, 2025 - DO PASS












SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB510 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)